Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-38] State and county contributions
not considered wages or salary. Contributions made by the State or the
counties under this part shall not be considered wages or salary of an
employee-beneficiary. No employee-beneficiary shall have any vested right in
or be entitled to receive any part of any contribution made to the fund. [L
2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next